Utah statutes.
73-2-1.2.   Director of Division of Water Rights -- Appointment of state
engineer.
The Division of Water Rights shall be administered by the state engineer who
shall act as the director of the Division of Water Rights and who shall be
appointed as provided by Section 73-2-1. Nothing contained in this act shall
modify, repeal or impair the powers or duties of the state engineer relating
to the administration, appropriation, adjudication and distribution of the
waters of the state of Utah as are conferred upon him pursuant to Title 73, or
the provisions of any other laws.
